apertium-deu-nld.nld.dix
    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ik</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>jij</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>je</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>u</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>hij</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>zij</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>het</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>wij</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>we</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>jullie</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ze</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

  
   <pardef n="probj__prn">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>mij</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>jou</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>je</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>u</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>hem</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>haar</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>het</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ons</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>jullie</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>hun</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>hen</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

  <!-- Conjunctions -->
  
   <pardef n="en_cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
   </pardef>
   <pardef n="als_cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Bijwoorden -->
    <pardef n="bijzonder__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>der</l>
	  <r><s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>derst</l>
	  <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="belangrijk__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>er</l>
	  <r><s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>st</l>
	  <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/intens__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>intens</l>
	  <r>intens<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>intenser</l>
	  <r>intens<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>meest intens</l>
	  <r>intens<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="graag__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="adv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <!-- Bijvoegelijke naamwoorden -->

    <pardef n="behulpza/am__adj">
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>am</l>
        <r>am<s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>mer</l>
        <r>am<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>amst</l>
        <r>am<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gere/ed__adj">
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r>ed<s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>der</l>
        <r>ed<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>dst</l>
        <r>ed<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="werkza/am__adj">
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>am</l>
        <r>am<s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>mer</l>
        <r>am<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>mst</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/bezet__adj">
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>bezet</l>
        <r>bezet<s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>meer bezet</l>
        <r>bezet<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>meeste bezet</l>
        <r>bezet<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bre/ed__adj">
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r>ed<s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>der</l>
        <r>ed<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>edst</l>
        <r>ed<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dik__adj">
      <e>
       <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>ker</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>st</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dun__adj">
      <e>
       <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>ner</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>st</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vrij__adj">
      <e>
       <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>ste</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gro/ot__adj">
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>ot</l>
        <r>ot<s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>oter</l>
        <r>ot<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>otst</l>
        <r>ot<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="pronoms personals de subjecte"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="pronoms personals d'objecte"><i/><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="bijzonder"><i>bijzonder</i><par n="bijzonder__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="belangrijk"><i>belangrijk</i><par n="belangrijk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="spoedig"><i>spoedig</i><par n="belangrijk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="intens"><i>intens</i><par n="/intens__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="graag"><i>graag</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="doch"><i>doch</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="eigenlijk"><i>eigenlijk</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="soms"><i>soms</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="zojuist"><i>zojuist</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nog"><i>nog</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="alleen"><i>alleen</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="al"><i>al</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="eindelijk"><i>eindelijk</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vandaag"><i>vandaag</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="immer"><i>immer</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="morgen"><i>morgen</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="morgens"><i>morgens</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dadelijk"><i>dadelijk</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nogal"><i>nogal</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="weer"><i>weer</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="voor"><i>voor</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="evenzeer"><i>evenzeer</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="alom"><i>alom</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="misschien"><i>misschien</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nu"><i>nu</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="na"><i>na</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dikwijls"><i>dikwijls</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ook"><i>ook</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="meer"><i>meer</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="veel"><i>veel</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nooit"><i>nooit</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="minder"><i>minder</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="beter"><i>beter</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anders"><i>anders</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="al"><i>al</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="samen"><i>samen</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="weinig"><i>weinig</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hier"><i>hier</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="binnen"><i>binnen</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="buiten"><i>buiten</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="altijd"><i>altijd</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="al"><i>al</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ongeveer"><i>ongeveer</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="steeds"><i>steeds</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sterk"><i>sterk</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bijna"><i>bijna</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="eerder"><i>eerder</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="verder"><i>verder</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="zo"><i>zo</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="inderdaad"><i>inderdaad</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="waarschijnlijk"><i>waarschijnlijk</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="zeker"><i>zeker</i><par n="graag__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="behulpzaam"><i>behulpza</i><par n="behulpza/am__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="voedzaam"><i>voedza</i><par n="behulpza/am__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gereed"><i>gere</i><par n="gere/ed__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="werkzaam"><i>werkza</i><par n="werkza/am__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bezet"><i></i><par n="/bezet__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="breed"><i>bre</i><par n="bre/ed__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dik"><i>dik</i><par n="dik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dun"><i>dun</i><par n="dun__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vrij"><i>vrij</i><par n="vrij__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="groot"><i>gro</i><par n="gro/ot__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="koud"><i>koud</i><par n="vrij__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kort"><i>kort</i><par n="vrij__adj"/></e>
